District of Columbia statutes.
42-3251

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Dwelling unit” means any habitable room or group of habitable rooms located within a residential building and forming a single unit which is used or intended to be used for living, sleeping, and the preparation and eating of meals; including a bachelor apartment.

(2)

“Multiple Dwelling” means any residential building containing 3 or more dwelling units, 3 or more rooming units, or any combination of dwelling or rooming units totaling 3 or more.

(3)

“Owner” means any individual, corporation, association, or partnership listed as the legal title holder of record and any owners’ association legally incorporated in accordance with Chapter 9 of Title 29 or Chapter 19 of this title that is the recognized representative of the households in a condominium or cooperative housing building.

(4)

“WASA” means the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority established by § 34-2202.02.

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-303, § 2, 52 DCR 1690
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(ii), 58 DCR 1720
D.C. Law 18-378, in par. (3), validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Multiple Dwelling Residence Water Lead Level Test Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-206, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 450).